Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-806
Public library federation fund; establishment.

Upon the establishment of a public library federation and a public library federation board, each participating county board shall establish a public library federation fund to be supported from the general fund of each participating local governing authority or from a public library tax levy. Any local governing authority which is not affiliated with the public library federation shall not be subject to the levy. The levy shall be subject to section 77-3442. The amount of tax support for the federation shall be subject to an agreement among the participating local governing authorities. All money received for the federation shall be remitted to the county treasurer for credit to the public library federation fund.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 6.